Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Office of Management and Budget.

Sec. 44.19.141.
Alaska office of management and budget.

There is in the Office of the Governor the Alaska office of management and budget.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1966; am § 11 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 15 ch 63 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.870

. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose and intent in enacting ch. 63, SLA 1983, see § 1, ch 63, SLA 1983, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.19.142.
Director.

The office of management and budget is administered by a director who is appointed by, and serves at the pleasure of, the governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 219 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 16 ch 63 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.871. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.143.
Personnel.

The director shall employ such personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

and the relevant provisions of AS 37.07.

History.

(§ 1 ch 219 SLA 1970; am § 17 ch 63 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.875. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.144.
Powers and duties of the director.

The director shall

supervise and administer the activities of the office;

advise the governor on matters of comprehensive state planning.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

The director may

with the written concurrence of the governor, enter into contracts and subcontracts on behalf of the state to carry out the provisions of AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

; contracting under this paragraph is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

act for the state in the initiation, investigation, evaluation of or participation in any program relative to the stated purpose of AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

that may involve more than one government or governmental unit;

on behalf of the state, accept and expend any gifts or grants made to the state with the approval of the governor when the gifts or grants were made for the purposes of furthering the objectives of the office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 219 SLA 1970; am §§ 18, 19 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 43 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.877. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.145.
Functions and duties of the office; authority to establish coordinating and advisory planning groups.

The office shall

provide technical assistance to the governor and the legislature in identifying long range goals and objectives for the state and its political subdivisions;

prepare and maintain a state comprehensive development plan;

provide information and assistance to state agencies to aid in governmental coordination and unity in the preparation of agency plans and programs;

review planning within state government as may be necessary for receipt of federal, state, or other funds;

participate with other countries, provinces, states, or subdivisions of them in international or interstate planning, and assist the state’s local governments, governmental conferences, and councils in planning and coordinating their activities;

encourage educational and research programs that further state planning and development, and provide administrative and technical services for them;

publish statistical information or other documentary material that will further the provisions and intent of AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

;

assist the governor and the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development in coordinating state agency activities that have an effect on the solution of local and regional development problems;

serve as a clearinghouse for information, data, and other materials that may be helpful or necessary to federal, state, or local governmental agencies in discharging their respective responsibilities or in obtaining federal or state financial or technical assistance;

review all proposals for the location of capital improvements by any state agency and advise and make recommendations concerning location of these capital improvements;

[Repealed, E.O. No. 106, § 15 (2003).]

conduct internal audits of agencies and programs within the executive branch of state government.

The office shall, in carrying out its functions, consult with local, regional, state, and federal officials, private groups and individuals, and with officials of other countries, provinces, and states, and may hold public hearings to obtain information for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

.

The governor may establish coordinating or advisory planning groups.

The office shall

coordinate its services and activities with those of other state departments and agencies to the fullest extent possible to avoid duplication;

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

cooperate with the University of Alaska and other appropriate public and private institutions in research and investigations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 219 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1972; am §§ 8, 10 ch 200 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 20 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1990; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 50 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 106, § 15 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.880. Renumbered in 1980.

In 2004, in (a)(8) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For a provision requesting the governor to establish an advisory planning group under this section to advise the governor on municipal involvement in a North Slope natural gas project, and outlining duties and annual reporting requirements for that advisory planning group, see sec. 74, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 44, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendment to (a) of this section is retroactive to March 11, 1984.

Sec. 44.19.147.
Internal audit records.

The office shall keep a complete file of internal audit reports resulting from audits conducted under AS

44.19.145(a)

, and a complete file of the internal audit work papers and other related supportive material. Internal audit work papers and other related supportive material are confidential, and internal audit reports are confidential until released by the governor. However, internal audit work papers and other related supportive material containing information, data, estimates, and statistics obtained during the course of an audit conducted under AS

44.19.145(a)

may be kept confidential only to the extent required by law applicable to the agency from which the material is or was obtained.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 2003)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 52, SLA 2003 (HB 243), see 2003 House Journal 770.

Sec. 44.19.150.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.046.]

Sec. 44.19.152.
Definitions.

In AS

44.19.141

—

44.19.152

,

“director” means the director of the office of management and budget;

“office” means the Alaska office of management and budget.

History.

(§ 1 ch 219 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 21 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 106, § 15 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.881. Renumbered in 1980.

Secs. 44.19.155 — 44.19.162.
Alaska Coastal Policy Council. [Repealed, E.O. No. 106, § 15 (2003).]

Secs. 44.19.165 — 44.19.171.
Alaska Women’s Commission. [Repealed, E.O. No. 84, § 9 (1993). For current law, see AS 44.19.600.]

Sec. 44.19.173.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 63 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 44.19.175.
Powers and duties. [Repealed, E.O. No. 84, § 9 (1993).]

Sec. 44.19.177.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.049.]

Sec. 44.19.179.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.052.]

Sec. 44.19.180.
Annual report. [Repealed, E.O. No. 84, § 9 (1993).]

Secs. 44.19.181 — 44.19.188.
Yukon-Taiya Commission. [Repealed, § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 44.19.189.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 46, § 2 (1980).]

Sec. 44.19.190.
Commission on transportation. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986. Former AS 44.19.190 was repealed by § 10 ch 200 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 44.19.191.
Powers and duties. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986. Former AS 44.19.191 was renumbered as AS 44.47.160 in 1980.]

Sec. 44.19.192.
Staff. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]

Secs. 44.19.200 — 44.19.210.
Local Affairs Agency. [Repealed, § 10 ch 200 SLA 1972. For current provisions, see generally AS 44.47.]

Secs. 44.19.220 — 44.19.240.
Rural Development. [Repealed, § 1 ch 69 SLA 1964.
For current provisions, see AS 44.47.130 — 44.47.190.]

Sec. 44.19.250.
[Renumbered as AS 44.47.565.]

Secs. 44.19.251 — 44.19.265.
Alaska Research Policy Act. [Repealed, E.O. No. 90 § 5 (1994).]

Secs. 44.19.270 — 44.19.340.
[Renumbered as AS 44.47.569 — 44.47.583.]

Secs. 44.19.350 — 44.19.440.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.054— 44.19.072.]

Secs. 44.19.441 — 44.19.449.
Equal Employment Opportunity. [Repealed, E.O. No. 78, § 4 (1991).]

Secs. 44.19.450 — 44.19.458.
Office of Equal Employment Opportunity. [Repealed, E.O. No. 104, § 4 (2003).
For current law, see AS 39.28.]

Sec. 44.19.460.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.100.]

Secs. 44.19.461,
44.19.466.
Alaska Historical Commission.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 43, § 2 (1980).
For current law, see AS 44.35.300 — 44.35.380.]

Sec. 44.19.470.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.110.]

Secs. 44.19.471,
44.19.476.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 43, § 2 (1980).]

Sec. 44.19.480.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.120.]

Secs. 44.19.481,
44.19.486.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 43, § 2 (1980).]

Sec. 44.19.490.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.130.]

Secs. 44.19.491,
44.19.496.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 43, § 2 (1980).]

Sec. 44.19.500.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.140.]

Sec. 44.19.501.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 43, § 2 (1980).]

Secs. 44.19.502 — 44.19.506.
Telecommunications Information Council; Powers and duties; Court system. [Repealed, E.O. No. 113 § 18 (2005).]

Sec. 44.19.510.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.150.]

Sec. 44.19.519.
Definitions. [Repealed, E.O. No. 113 § 18 (2005).]

Sec. 44.19.520.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.160.]

Secs. 44.19.521 — 44.19.529.
Alaska Commission on Children and Youth. [Repealed by E.O. No. 84, § 9 (1993). For current law, see AS 44.19.600.]

Secs. 44.19.530 — 44.19.560.
[Renumbered as AS 44.31.170 — 44.31.200.]

Secs. 44.19.561 — 44.19.577.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 73 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 44.19.580.
Rural Development Agency. [Repealed, § 10 ch 200 SLA 1972. For current law, see AS 44.47.130 — 44.47.190.]

Sec. 44.19.581.
[Renumbered as AS 44.99.009.]

Sec. 44.19.590.
[Repealed, § 10 ch 200 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 44.19.591.
[Renumbered as AS 44.99.010.]

Secs. 44.19.600 — 44.19.620.
[Repealed, § 10 ch 200 SLA 1972.]